California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(1) “Blood and blood component products” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 4920.

(2) “Direct
 supervision” has the same meaning as that term is defined in subdivision (e) of Section 2034 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) “Indirect supervision” has the same meaning as that term is defined in subdivision (f) of Section 2034 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 752, Sec. 2.   (AB 1282)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4836.6.

The board shall take action pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 4875) of this chapter against any veterinarian licensed or authorized to practice in this state who permits any registered veterinary technician or veterinary assistant to perform any animal health care services other than those allowed by this article.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4836.5 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 752, Sec. 3.   (AB 1282)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4839.

For purposes of this article, “registered veterinary technician” means a person who has met the requirements set forth in Section 4841.5 and is registered by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 12.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4839.5.

No person shall use the title “registered veterinary technician” or “veterinary technician,” or any other words, letters, or symbols, including, but not limited to, the abbreviation “R.V.T.,” with the intent to represent that the person is authorized to act as a registered veterinary technician, unless that person meets the requirements of Section 4839.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 538, Sec. 17.   (AB 1980)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4840.

(a) Registered veterinary technicians and veterinary assistants are approved to perform animal health care services not otherwise prohibited by law under the supervision of a veterinarian licensed or authorized to practice in this state.

(b) (1) Registered veterinary technicians and veterinary assistants may perform animal health care services not otherwise prohibited by law on those animals housed in public or private animal shelters, humane societies, or societies for the prevention of cruelty to animals pursuant to the direct order, written order, or telephonic order of a veterinarian
 licensed or authorized to practice in this state.

(2) An order established by a veterinarian pursuant to paragraph (1) may include any of the following information:

(A) Time periods by which an animal is required to be assessed at intake and monitored while in the custody of an agency.

(B) Protocols to address the treatment of common medical conditions encountered in animals.

(C) Protocols for controlling infectious and zoonotic diseases and for preventing environmental contamination.

(D) Protocols for controlling the acute pain of an animal.

(E) Communication requirements between the registered veterinary technician and the supervising veterinarian.

(F) Euthanasia criteria for medically related cases.

(c) Registered veterinary technicians may perform dental care procedures, including tooth extractions, under the supervision of a veterinarian licensed or authorized to practice in this state. 

(d) Registered veterinary technicians may apply for registration from the federal Drug Enforcement Administration that authorizes the direct purchase of sodium pentobarbital for the performance of euthanasia as provided for in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 4827 without the supervision or authorization of a licensed veterinarian.

(e) Registered veterinary technicians may act as an agent of the supervising veterinarian in establishing the veterinarian-client-patient relationship for the purposes of administering preventive or prophylactic vaccines or medications for the control or eradication of apparent or anticipated internal or external parasites in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 4826.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 371, Sec. 1.   (AB 516)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4840.2.

Registered veterinary technicians and veterinary assistants shall not perform the following health care services:

(a) Surgery.

(b) Diagnosis and prognosis of animal diseases.

(c) Prescribing of drugs, medicine, and appliances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 239, Sec. 8.   (AB 1839)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4840.5.

Under conditions of an emergency, a registered veterinary technician may render such lifesaving aid and treatment as may be prescribed under regulations adopted by the board pursuant to Section 4836. Such emergency aid and treatment if rendered to an animal patient not in the presence of a licensed veterinarian may only be continued under the direction of a licensed veterinarian. “Emergency” for the purpose of this section, means that the animal has been placed in a life-threatening condition where immediate treatment is necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429, Sec. 11.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4840.6.

Any registered veterinary technician registered in this state who in good faith renders emergency animal health care at the scene of the emergency, or his or her employing veterinarian or agency authorized under Section 4840.9, shall not be liable for any civil damages as the result of acts or omissions by a registered veterinary technician rendering the emergency care. This section shall not grant immunity from civil damages when the registered veterinary technician is grossly negligent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 60, Sec. 26.   Effective July 6, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4840.7.

(a) A registered veterinary technician who has been examined by the board in the area of radiation safety and techniques may operate radiographic equipment under the indirect supervision of a licensed veterinarian.

(b) (1) A veterinary assistant who has been trained in the area of radiation safety and techniques may operate radiographic equipment under the direct supervision of a registered veterinary technician or a licensed veterinarian.

(2) The responsible managing licensee of a veterinary premises shall maintain records of the training described in paragraph (1).
 A veterinary assistant for whom records of this training do not exist shall not operate radiographic equipment.

(3) The training records described in paragraph (2) shall be made available to the board upon request and at the time of any inspection of the veterinary premises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 239, Sec. 9.   (AB 1839)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4840.9.

Registered veterinary technicians and veterinary assistants may be employed by any veterinarian licensed or authorized to practice in this state or by any governmental agency which employs veterinarians. However, the employer must be fully aware of the provisions of this article as stated by regulations adopted by the board pursuant to Section 4836.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 239, Sec. 10.   (AB 1839)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4841.

Any person performing any of the tasks designated by the board pursuant to Section 4836 and any person representing himself or herself as a registered veterinary technician in this state, shall hold a valid unexpired certificate of registration as provided in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 60, Sec. 29.   Effective July 6, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4841.1.

This article shall not apply to students in a California veterinary technology program who perform the job tasks for registered veterinary technicians as part of their educational experience, including students both on and off campus acting under the direct supervision of a California licensed veterinarian, except that those students shall only administer controlled substances and perform drug compounding under the immediate supervision of a registered veterinary technician or California licensed veterinarian. For purposes of this section, “immediate supervision” means supervision by a person who is within audible and visual range of both the animal patient and the person being supervised.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 13.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4841.2.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a graduate of a recognized veterinary college shall not perform animal health care tasks otherwise performed by a registered veterinary technician unless the graduate has obtained licensure or registration as otherwise required under this chapter.

(b) If, on or before January 1, 2020, a graduate of a recognized veterinary college has performed animal health care tasks otherwise performed by a registered veterinary technician, the graduate shall discontinue performing such duties on or after January 1, 2020, unless the graduate is issued a license or registration as otherwise required under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 571, Sec. 29.   (SB 1480)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4841.4.

(a) The board, by means of examination, shall determine the professional qualifications of all applicants who wish to register as veterinary technicians in California. A registration shall not be issued to anyone who has not demonstrated their competency by examination.

(b) The examination for veterinary technicians shall consist of a national licensing examination.

(c) For examination purposes, the board may make contractual arrangements on a sole source basis with organizations furnishing examination material as it may deem desirable and shall be exempt from Section 10115 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 14.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4841.5.

(a) To obtain registration as a registered veterinary technician, the applicant shall satisfy the following requirements:

(1) Complete and submit an application upon a form furnished by the board.

(2) Pay the applicable fees specified in Section 4905.

(3) Pursuant to Section 144, submit a full set of fingerprints for the purpose of conducting a criminal history record check and undergo a state and federal criminal offender record information search conducted through the Department of Justice, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department
 of Justice shall provide a state or federal response to the board pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(4) Furnish satisfactory evidence of one of the following:

(A) Graduation from, at minimum, a two-year curriculum in veterinary technology, in a college or other postsecondary institution accredited by the American Veterinary Medical Association (AVMA). In the case of a private postsecondary institution, the institution shall also be approved by the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education (BPPE). Proof of graduation shall be confirmed through electronic means or direct submission from the college, other postsecondary institution, or American Association of Veterinary State Boards (AAVSB).

(B) A combination of education and clinical practice experience, as determined by the board. All education shall be accredited by the AVMA or the Accrediting Commission for Community and Junior Colleges, approved by the BPPE, or provided by a California public school.

(C) Graduation from a veterinary college recognized by the board. Proof of graduation shall be confirmed through electronic means or direct submission from the veterinary college or the AAVSB.

(D) Education equivalency certified by the AAVSB’s Program for the Assessment of Veterinary Education Equivalence (PAVE) for Veterinary Technicians. The certificate of education equivalence shall be confirmed through electronic means or direct submission from the American Association of Veterinary State Boards.

(E) Education equivalency certified by the Educational Commission for Foreign Veterinary Graduates (ECFVG) or PAVE. The certificate of education equivalence shall be confirmed through electronic means or direct submission from ECFVG or PAVE.

(5) Pass the national licensing examination for veterinary technicians. If the applicant passed the national licensing examination over five years from the date of submitting the veterinary technician registration application, the applicant shall perform one of the following:

(A) Retake and pass the national licensing examination.

(B) Submit proof of having practiced clinical veterinary medicine for a minimum of two years
 and completed a minimum of 2,500 hours of clinical practice in another state, Canadian province, or United States territory within the three years immediately preceding filing an application for licensure in this state.

(C) Complete the minimum continuing education requirements of Section 4858.2 for the current and preceding year.

(b) The applicant shall disclose each state, Canadian province, or United States territory in which the applicant currently holds or has ever held a license, registration, certificate, or permit to practice veterinary medicine. License verification, including any disciplinary or enforcement history, shall be confirmed through electronic means or direct submission from each state, Canadian province, or United States territory in which the applicant
 has identified that the applicant holds or has ever held a license to practice veterinary medicine.

(c) An application for veterinary technician registration shall be subject to denial pursuant to Sections 480 and 4883.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 232, Sec. 6.   (SB 1311)   Effective September 14, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4842.

The board may deny a registered veterinary technician application if the applicant has done any of the following:

(a) Committed any act that would be grounds for the suspension or revocation of registration under this chapter.

(b) While unregistered, committed, or aided and abetted the commission of, any act for which a certificate of registration is required by this chapter.

(c) Knowingly made any false statement in the application.

(d) Been convicted of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions and duties of a registered veterinary technician.

(e) Committed any act that resulted in a revocation by another state of the applicant’s license, registration, or other procedure by virtue of which one is licensed or allowed to practice veterinary technology in that state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 16.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4842.2.

All funds collected by the board under this article shall be deposited in the California Veterinary Medical Board Contingent Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 61.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4842.6.

(a) Each individual registered by the board shall biennially apply for renewal of his or her license or registration on or before the last day of the applicant’s birthday month. The application shall be made on a form provided by the board.

(b) The application shall contain a statement to the effect that the applicant has not been convicted of a felony, has not been the subject of professional disciplinary action taken by any public agency in California or any other state or territory, and has not violated any of the provisions of this chapter. If the applicant is unable to make that statement, the application shall contain a statement of the conviction, professional discipline, or violation.

(c) The board may, as part of the renewal process, make necessary inquiries of the applicant and conduct an investigation in order to determine if cause for disciplinary action exists.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1007, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4842.7.

Every person registered by the board under this article who changes their mailing address shall notify the board of their new mailing address within 30 days of the change. The board shall not renew the registration of any person who fails to comply with this section unless the person pays the penalty fee prescribed in Section 4905. An applicant for the renewal of a registration shall specify in their application whether they have changed their mailing address and the board may accept that statement as evidence of the fact.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 6.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4843.5.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, an expired certificate of registration may be renewed at any time within five years after its expiration on filing of an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the board, and payment of all accrued and unpaid renewal fees. If the certificate of registration is renewed more than 30 days after its expiration, the registrant, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the delinquency fee prescribed by this article. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the application is filed, on the date all renewal fees are paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee, if any, is paid, whichever occurs last.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 306, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4844.

A person who fails to renew his certificate of registration within five years after its expiration may not renew it, and it shall not be restored, reissued, or reinstated thereafter, but that person may apply for and obtain a new certificate of registration if:

(a) He or she is not subject to denial of registration under Section 480.

(b) No fact, circumstance, or condition exists which, if the certificate of registration were issued, would justify its revocation or suspension.

(c) He or she takes and passes the examination, if any, that would be required of him or her if he or
 she were then applying for a certificate of registration for the first time, or otherwise establishes to the satisfaction of the board that, with due regard for the public interest, he or she is qualified to be a registered veterinary technician.

(d) He or she pays all of the fees that would be required of him or her if he or she were applying for the certificate of registration for the first time.

The board may, by regulation, provide for the waiver or refund of all or any part of the examination fee when a certificate of registration is issued without an examination pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 395, Sec. 12.   (SB 1243)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4845.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may, in its sole discretion, issue a probationary registration to an applicant subject to terms and conditions deemed appropriate by the board, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Continuing medical, psychiatric, or psychological treatment.

(2) Ongoing participation in a specified rehabilitation program.

(3) Abstention from the use of alcohol or drugs.

(4) Compliance with all provisions of this chapter.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and for purposes of this section, when deciding whether to issue a probationary registration, the board shall request that an applicant with a dismissed conviction provide proof of that dismissal and shall give special consideration to applicants whose convictions have been dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4 or 1203.4a of the Penal Code.

(2) The board shall also take into account and consider any other reasonable documents or individual character references provided by the applicant that may serve as evidence of rehabilitation as deemed appropriate by the board.

(c) The board may modify or terminate the terms and conditions imposed on the probationary registration upon receipt of a petition from the applicant or registrant.

(d) For purposes of issuing a probationary license to qualified new applicants, the board shall develop standard terms of probation that shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) A three-year limit on the individual probationary registration.

(2) A process to obtain a standard registration for applicants who were issued a probationary registration.

(3) Supervision requirements.

(4) Compliance and quarterly reporting requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 675, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Issuance of Licenses [4846. - 4857.]

4846.

(a) In order to obtain a license to practice veterinary medicine in California, an individual shall meet the following requirements:

(1) Graduate from a veterinary college recognized by the board or receive a certificate from the Educational Commission for Foreign Veterinary Graduates (ECFVG) or the Program for the Assessment of Veterinary Education Equivalence (PAVE). Proof of graduation shall be directly submitted to the board by the veterinary college or from the American Association of Veterinary State Boards (AAVSB). Proof of certificate shall be directly submitted to the board by ECFVG or PAVE.

(2) Complete a board-approved license application.

(3) Pay the applicable fees specified in Section 4905.

(4) As directed by the board pursuant to Section 144, submit a full set of fingerprints for the purpose of conducting a criminal history record check and undergo a state and federal criminal offender record information search conducted through the Department of Justice, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state or federal response to the board pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(5) Pass an examination consisting of the following:

(A) A licensing examination that is administered on a national basis. If the applicant passed the national licensing examination over five years from the date of submitting the California veterinarian license
 application, the applicant shall satisfy one of the following:

(i) Retake and pass the national licensing examination.

(ii) Submit proof of having practiced clinical veterinary medicine for a minimum of two years and completed a minimum of 2,500 hours of clinical practice in another state, Canadian province, or United States territory within the three years immediately preceding filing an application for licensure in this state.

(iii) Complete the minimum continuing education requirements of Section 4858.1 for the current and preceding year.

(B) A veterinary law examination administered by the board concerning the statutes and regulations of this chapter. The examination may be administered by regular mail, email, or by other electronic means. The
 applicant shall certify that the applicant personally completed the examination. Any false statement is a violation subject to Section 4831. Every applicant who obtains a score of at least 80 percent on the veterinary law examination shall be deemed to have passed. University of California and Western University of Health Sciences veterinary medical students who have successfully completed a board-approved course on veterinary law and ethics covering this chapter shall be exempt from this subparagraph.

(b) The applicant shall disclose each state, Canadian province, or United States territory in which the applicant currently holds or has ever held a license to practice veterinary medicine. License verification, including any disciplinary or enforcement history, shall be confirmed through electronic means or direct submission from each state, Canadian province, or United States territory in which the applicant has identified the applicant holds
 or has ever held a license to practice veterinary medicine.

(c) A veterinarian license application shall be subject to denial pursuant to Sections 480, 4875, and 4883.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 20.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4846.1.

If the veterinary college from which an applicant is graduated is not recognized by the board, the board shall have the authority to determine the qualifications of such graduates and to review the quality of the educational experience attained by them in an unrecognized veterinary college. The board shall have the authority to adopt rules and regulations to implement this provision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 265.)
-------------------------------------------

4846.2.

If the board finds in evaluating the graduate described in Section 4846.1 that such applicant is deficient in qualification or in the quality of his educational experience the board may require such applicant to fulfill such other remedial or other requirements as the board, by regulation, may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 265.)
-------------------------------------------

4847.1.

(a) If an applicant fails to complete their application within one year after it has been filed, the application shall be considered abandoned and the application fee forfeited.

(b) An application submitted subsequent to the abandonment of the former application shall be treated as a new application.

(c) An applicant shall notify the board of any changes in mailing or employment address that occur after filing the application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 631, Sec. 15.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4848.1.

(a) A veterinarian engaged in the practice of veterinary medicine, as defined in Section 4826, employed by the University of California and engaged in the performance of duties in connection with the School of Veterinary Medicine or employed by the Western University of Health Sciences and engaged in the performance of duties in connection with the College of Veterinary Medicine shall be issued a university license pursuant to this section or hold a license to practice veterinary medicine in this state.

(b) An individual may apply for and be issued a university license if all of the following are satisfied:

(1) The applicant is currently employed by the University of California or Western University
 of Health Sciences, as defined in subdivision (a).

(2) The applicant passes an examination concerning the statutes and regulations of this chapter, administered by the board, pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 4846.

(3) The applicant completes and submits the application specified by the board and pays the application and the initial license fee, pursuant to Section 4905.

(c) A university license:

(1) Shall automatically cease to be valid upon termination or cessation of employment by the University of California or by the Western University of Health Sciences.

(2) Shall be subject to the license renewal provisions in Section 4900 and the payment of
 the renewal fee pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 4905.

(3) Shall be subject to denial, revocation, or suspension pursuant to Sections 480, 4875, and 4883.

(4) Authorizes the holder to practice veterinary medicine only at an educational institution described in subdivision (a) and any locations formally affiliated with those institutions.

(d) An individual who holds a university license is exempt from satisfying the license renewal requirements of Section 4858.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 22.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4850.

Every person holding a license under this chapter shall conspicuously display the license in his or her principal place of business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 621, Sec. 80.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.

Every person holding a license issued under this chapter who changes his or her mailing address shall notify the board of his or her new mailing address within 30 days of the change. The board shall not renew the license of any person who fails to comply with this section unless the person pays the penalty fee prescribed in Section 4905. An applicant for the renewal of a license shall specify in his or her application whether he or she has changed his or her mailing address and the board may accept that statement as evidence of the fact.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 642, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4853.

(a) All veterinary premises shall be registered with the board. The certificate of registration shall be on a form prescribed in accordance with Section 164.

(b) “Premises” for purposes of this chapter shall mean the location of operation where veterinary medicine, veterinary dentistry, veterinary surgery, and the various branches thereof is being practiced and shall include a building, kennel, mobile unit, or vehicle. Mobile units and vehicles shall be exempted from independent registration with the board if they are operated from a building or facility that is the licensee manager’s principal place of business and the building is registered with the board, and the
 registration identifies and declares the use of the mobile unit or vehicle.

(c) The owner or operator of a veterinary premises shall submit a premises registration application to the board. The application shall set forth the name of each owner or operator of the premises, including the type of corporate entity, if applicable, the name of the premises, and the name of the responsible licensee manager who is to act for and on behalf of the registered premises. Substitution of the responsible licensee manager may be accomplished by application to the board if the following conditions are met:

(1) The person substituted qualifies by presenting satisfactory evidence that the person possesses a valid, unexpired, and unrevoked license as provided by this chapter and that the license is
 not currently under suspension.

(2) No circumvention of the law is contemplated by the substitution.

(d) If the owner or operator of a veterinary premises is a veterinary corporation practicing pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 4910), the application shall set forth the names and titles of each officer, director, or shareholder. Any changes in the officers, directors, or shareholders shall be reported to the board within 30 days.

(e) If the owner or operator of a veterinary premises is a corporation or other artificial legal entity other than a veterinary corporation as provided under subdivision (d), the application shall set forth the names and titles of all owners, officers, general partners, if
 any, and the agent for service of process. Any changes in the owners, officers, general partners, or agent for service of process shall be reported to the board within 30 days.

(f) The premises registration is nontransferable. In the event of change of an owner or operator of the premises, the premises registration holder shall notify the board of the change within 30 days after the change.

(g) This section does not authorize any person, corporation, or artificial legal entity, other than a California-licensed veterinarian or a veterinary corporation practicing pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 4910) and the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act (Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), to furnish to any
 person or animal patient any veterinary services, diagnosis, or treatment within the scope of California veterinarian licensure under this chapter. This section does not authorize any person, other than a California-licensed veterinarian within the scope of their license, to engage directly or indirectly in the practice of veterinary medicine, veterinary surgery, veterinary dentistry, and the various branches thereof in accordance with Section 4826. This section does not regulate, govern, or affect in any manner the practice of veterinary medicine, veterinary surgery, or veterinary dentistry by any person duly licensed to engage in such practice.

(h) The location where a veterinarian practices telehealth shall be exempt from the requirement that it be registered pursuant to this section if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The veterinarian does not perform in-person examination or treatment of animal patients at the location.

(2) No veterinary drug, medicine, appliance, or medical equipment is kept at the location.

(3) The veterinary medical records required pursuant to Sections 4855 and 4856 are created, maintained, and stored so as to protect the veterinary medical records from access by unauthorized individuals, damage, or loss.

(4) The following information shall be provided on any electronic publication, including any internet website, through which the veterinarian provides or offers to provide veterinary medical services:

(A) The veterinarian’s name, contact information, and California veterinarian license number, prominently displayed.

(B) Contact information and instruction for obtaining a copy of the animal patient’s medical records.

(C) A statement that a client may contact the Veterinary Medical Board if the client has any questions or complaints regarding the veterinarian.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 5.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4853.1.

Each application to register a premises pursuant to Section 4853 shall be made on a form provided by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 631, Sec. 21.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4853.5.

When it has been adjudicated in an administrative hearing that the licensee manager has failed to keep the premises and all equipment therein in a clean and sanitary condition as provided for in subdivision (h) of Section 4883, or is in violation of any of the provisions of Section 4854, the board may withhold, suspend, or revoke the registration of veterinary premises, or assess a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) per day until such violation has been rectified, or by both such suspension and fine. The total amount of any fine assessed pursuant to this section shall not exceed five thousand dollars
 ($5,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 471, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

4853.6.

(a) The board shall deny, suspend, or revoke registration of a veterinary premises if any of the following occur:

(1) The licensee manager set forth in the application in accordance with Section 4853 ceases to become responsible for management of the registered premises and no substitution of the responsible licensee manager has been made by application as provided for in Section 4853.

(2) The premises registration holder or the licensee manager has, under proceedings conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the
 Government Code, the license to practice veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry revoked or suspended.

(3) Unless licensed pursuant to Section 4825, the premises registration holder has practiced, influenced, or exerted control over the provision of veterinary medicine, veterinary dentistry, veterinary surgery, and the various branches thereof.

(b) The board shall not renew the premises registration if there is no licensee manager associated with the premises.

(c) The board may deny, suspend, or revoke registration of the veterinary premises for unlicensed practice of veterinary medicine, veterinary dentistry, veterinary surgery, and the various branches thereof by the premises registration
 holder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 631, Sec. 22.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4853.7.

A premise registration that is not renewed within five years after its expiration may not be renewed and shall not be restored, reissued, or reinstated thereafter. However, an application for a new premise registration may be submitted and obtained if both of the following conditions are met:

(a) No fact, circumstance, or condition exists that, if the premise registration was issued, would justify its revocation or suspension.

(b) All of the fees that would be required for the initial premise registration are paid at the time of application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 484, Sec. 50.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4854.

All premises where veterinary medicine, veterinary dentistry, or veterinary surgery is being practiced, and all instruments, apparatus and apparel used in connection with those practices, shall be kept clean and sanitary at all times, and shall conform to those minimum standards established by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1314.)
-------------------------------------------

4854.1.

A premises registration holder who is not a California-licensed veterinarian pursuant to Section 4825 shall not interfere with, control, or otherwise direct the professional judgment of any California licensed veterinarian or registered veterinary technician. The board may require any information, including, but not limited to, employment contracts between the premises registration holder and a California-licensed veterinarian or registered veterinary technician, the board deems is reasonably necessary for the enforcement of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 631, Sec. 23.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4854.5.

(a) Every off-campus educational program site shall display in a conspicuous place a consumer notification specifying that the veterinary facilities are also being used for diagnosis and treatment of animals by graduate students enrolled in a veterinary medicine program.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 4831, or any other provision of law, a violation of subdivision (a) shall not be a crime.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 131, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4855.

(a) A veterinarian subject to the provisions of this chapter shall, as required by regulation of the board, keep a written record of all animals receiving veterinary services, and provide a copy of that record to the client or the client’s authorized agent within five days of receiving the client’s or the client’s authorized agent’s verbal or written request.

(b) If requested verbally or in writing by the client or the client’s authorized agent because the animal is in critical condition or direct transfer to another veterinary premises for medical care is recommended, the veterinarian, upon release of the animal patient from the veterinarian’s care, shall either:

(1) Provide a copy or summary of the
 written record to the client or the client’s authorized agent.

(2) If a written record is not available upon release of the animal patient, communicate information to facilitate continuity of care of the animal patient either to:

(A) The receiving veterinarian or veterinary premises.
